vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions.foma
  [ [..] -> {Ь} || [.#.|br] {Ü} [ [{Ç}|{N}|{R}|{S}|{T}|{Z}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ {ts} @-> {ц} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {şç} @-> {щ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ [{Ş} [{ç}|{Ç}]] @-> {Щ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ [{T} [{s}|{S}]] @-> {Ц} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {l} -> {ль} || [ [{e}|{i}|{ö}|{ü}|{E}|{İ}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ {L} -> {ЛЬ} || [ [{E}|{İ}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] | [br|.#.] ] ] .o.
  [ {ts} @-> {ц} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ [{T} [{s}|{S}]] @-> {Ц} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {şç} @-> {щ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ [{Ş} [{ç}|{Ç}]] @-> {Щ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {e} -> {э} || [ [br|.#.] | [{a}|{â}|{e}|{ı}|{i}|{o}|{ö}|{u}|{ü}|{A}|{Â}|{E}|{I}|{İ}|{O}|{Ö}|{U}|{Ü}|{а}|{е}|{э}|{я}|{А}|{Е}|{Э}|{Я}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {E} -> {Э} || [ [br|.#.] | [{A}|{Â}|{E}|{I}|{İ}|{O}|{Ö}|{U}|{Ü}|{А}|{Е}|{Э}|{Я}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {ö} -> {о} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{m}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{M}|{P}|{Ş}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ö} -> {О} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{m}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{M}|{P}|{Ş}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {ü} -> {у} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{m}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{M}|{P}|{Ş}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ü} -> {У} || [.#.|br] [ [{b}|{c}|{g}|{k}|{m}|{p}|{ş}|{B}|{C}|{G}|{K}|{M}|{P}|{Ş}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {ö} @-> {о} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ö} @-> {О} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {ü} @-> {у} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ü} @-> {У} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {m} {a} {a} {l} -> {мааль} || _ [ [\[{e}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {M} {a} {a} {l} -> {Мааль} || _ [ [\[{e}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {M} {A} {A} {L} -> {МААЛЬ} || _ [ [\[{E}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {k} {ü} {f} -> {куфь} || _ [ [\[{e}|{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {K} {ü} {f} -> {Куфь} || _ [ [\[{e}|{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {K} {Ü} {F} -> {КУФЬ} || _ [ [\[{E}|{Ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {k} {ö} {z} -> {козь} || _ [ [\[{e}|{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {K} {ö} {z} -> {Козь} || _ [ [\[{e}|{ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {K} {Ö} {Z} -> {КОЗЬ} || _ [ [\[{E}|{Ü}]] ] ] .o.
  [ [{#} | {N} {o} {.}] @-> {№} ] .o.
  [ {t} {s} {i} -> {ци} || _ [ [\[{z}|{ñ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {T} [{s}|{S}] [{i}|{İ}] -> {ЦИ} || _ [ [\[{z}|{Z}|{ñ}|{Ñ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {t} {s} -> {ц} || _ [ [{o}|{u}] ] ] .o.
  [ {T} [{s}|{S}] -> {Ц} || _ [ [{o}|{O}|{u}|{U}] ] ] .o.
  [ {t} {s} -> {ц} || _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] ] .o.
  [ {T} [{s}|{S}] -> {Ц} || _ [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] ] .o.
  [ {t} {s} -> {ц} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {T} [{s}|{S}] -> {Ц} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {tsиал} @-> {циал} ] .o.
  [ {TSИАЛ} @-> {ЦИАЛ} ] .o.
  [ [{ь}|{Ь}] -> 0 || _ [ [{i}|{İ}] ] ] .o.
  [ {y} {a} -> {ья} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Y} [{a}|{A}] -> {ЬЯ} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {y} {e} -> {ье} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Y} [{e}|{E}] -> {ЬЕ} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {y} [{o}|{ö}] -> {ьё} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Y} [{o}|{O}|{ö}|{Ö}] -> {ЬЁ} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ]
];
define CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'3(br) [
  [ [{y} [{o}|{ö}]] @-> {ё} ] .o.
  [ [[{y}|{Y}] [{o}|{O}|{ö}|{Ö}]] @-> {Ё} ] .o.
  [ {y} [{u}|{ü}] -> {ью} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Y} [{u}|{U}|{ü}|{Ü}] -> {ЬЮ} || [ [{b}|{c}|{ç}|{d}|{f}|{g}|{ğ}|{h}|{j}|{k}|{l}|{m}|{n}|{ñ}|{p}|{q}|{r}|{s}|{ş}|{t}|{v}|{z}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{V}|{Z}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ [{y} [{u}|{ü}]] @-> {ю} ] .o.
  [ [[{y}|{Y}] [{u}|{U}|{ü}|{Ü}]] @-> {Ю} ] .o.
  [ [{ь}|{Ь}] -> 0 || _ [ [{a}|{A}] ] ] .o.
  [ {C} -> {ДЖ} || _ [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Й}|{О}|{У}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}] ] ] .o.
  [ {C} -> {ДЖ} || [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Й}|{О}|{У}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ğ} -> {ГЪ} || _ [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ğ} -> {ГЪ} || [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Ъ}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Q} -> {КЪ} || _ [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Q} -> {КЪ} || [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Ъ}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ñ} -> {НЪ} || _ [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ñ} -> {НЪ} || [ [{A}|{Â}|{B}|{C}|{Ç}|{D}|{E}|{F}|{G}|{Ğ}|{H}|{I}|{İ}|{J}|{K}|{L}|{M}|{N}|{Ñ}|{O}|{Ö}|{P}|{Q}|{R}|{S}|{Ş}|{T}|{U}|{Ü}|{V}|{Y}|{Z}|{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Ъ}] ] _ ]
];
define CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS(br) CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'1(br) .o. CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'2(br) .o. CRH'CYRL'PATTERNS'3(br);

define CYRL'CLEANUP [
  {ь}       @-> 0 || к _ к , л _ л , н _ н , р _ р , с _ с, т _ т ,,
  {Ь}       @-> 0 || К _ К , Л _ Л , Н _ Н , Р _ Р , С _ С, Т _ Т ,,
  [{ь}|{Ь}] @-> 0 || К _ к , Л _ л , Н _ н , Р _ р , С _ с, Т _ т ,,

  # убираем ьы и ь..ы
  # remove ьы и ь..ы
  [{ь}|{Ь}] @-> 0 || _ ы ,,
  {Ь}       @-> 0 || _ Ы ,,
  [{ь}|{Ь}] @-> 0 || _ [г|д|к|л|м|н|п|р|с|т|ч|ш|Г|Д|К|Л|М|Н|П|Р|С|Т|Ч|Ш] ы ,,
  {Ь}       @-> 0 || _ [г|д|к|л|м|н|п|р|с|т|ч|ш|Г|Д|К|Л|М|Н|П|Р|С|Т|Ч|Ш] Ы ,,
  [{ь}|{Ь}] @-> 0 || _ [г|к|н|Г|К|Н] [ъ|Ъ] ы ,,
  {Ь}       @-> 0 || _ [Г|К|Н] {ЪЫ} ,,

  # убираем йь
  # remove йь
  {ь} @-> 0 || й _ ,,
  {Ь} @-> 0 || Й _ ,,

  # частичное решение проблемы слова юз - 100
  # Partial solution of the problem of the word юз ("100")
  # notice that these are cross-word patterns
  {ь} @-> 0 || {эки юз} _ , {Эки юз} _ , {ЭКИ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {учь юз} _ , {Учь юз} _ , {УЧЬ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {дёрт юз} _ , {Дёрт юз} _ , {ДЁРТ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {беш юз} _ , {Беш юз} _ , {БЕШ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {алты юз} _ , {Алты юз} _ , {АЛТЫ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {еди юз} _ , {Еди юз} _ , {ЕДИ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {секиз юз} _ , {Секиз юз} _ , {СЕКИЗ ЮЗ} _ ,
               {докъуз юз} _ , {Докъуз юз} _ , {ДОКЪУЗ ЮЗ} _
];
